ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Vânătoare și tir > Tir cu arcul > Arcuri și arbalete > Arcuri pentru tineret: Arcuri compuse pentru copii și tineret; Arcuri recurve și longbow pentru copii și tineret; Arcuri de jucărie și cu ventuze pentru copii
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Caça e tiro > Tiro com arco > Arcos e bestas > Arcos juvenis: Arcos compostos para jovens; Arcos recurvos e longos para jovens; Arcos de brincar e com ventosas para jovens
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Săn bắn > Bắn cung > Cung và bộ cung tên > Cung tuổi Trẻ: Cung trợ lực cho trẻ em; Cung cong & cung dài cho trẻ em; Cung đồ chơi & cung mềm cho trẻ em
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 打獵和射擊 > 射箭 > 弓弩 > 青少年弓: 青少年複合弓; 青少年反曲弓與長弓; 青少年玩具與安全軟弓
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 사냥/사격 > 양궁 > 활/석궁 > 청소년용 활: 유소년용 컴파운드 보우; 유소년용 리커브 및 롱보우; 유소년용 장난감 및 소프트 보우
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Jagen en schieten > Boogschieten > Bogen en kruisbogen > Jeugdbogen: Compoundbogen voor jeugd; Recurve- en longbows voor jeugd; Speelgoed- en zachte bogen voor jeugd
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > 狩猟・射撃 > アーチェリー > ボウ・クロスボウ > ユースボウ: ユース用コンパウンドボウ; ユース用リカーブ＆ロングボウ; ユース用おもちゃ＆ソフトボウ
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Hunting & Shooting > Archery > Bows & Crossbows > Youth Bows: Youth Compound Bows; Youth Recurve & Longbows; Youth Toy & Soft Bows
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Vadászat és lövészet > Íjászat > Íjak és számszeríjak > Ifjúsági íjak: Ifjúsági csigás íjak; Ifjúsági reflex- és hosszúíjak; Ifjúsági játék- és puha íjak
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > การล่าสัตว์และยิงปืน > การยิงธนู > คันธนูและหน้าไม้ > คันธนูสำหรับเด็ก: ธนูทดกำลังสำหรับเด็ก; ธนูรีเคิร์ฟและธนูยาวสำหรับเด็ก; ธนูของเล่นและธนูปลอดภัยสำหรับเด็ก
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lov a střelba > Lukostřelba > Luky a kuše > Dětské luky: Dětské kladkové luky; Dětské reflexní a dlouhé luky; Dětské luky a pěnové luky
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Caccia e tiro a segno > Tiro con l'arco > Archi e balestre > Archi per tiro: Archi compound per ragazzi; Archi ricurvi e longbow per ragazzi; Archi giocattolo e morbidi per ragazzi
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Metsästys ja ammunta > Jousiammunta > Jouset ja varsijouset > Nuorisojouset: Nuorten taljajouset; Nuorten vastakaari- ja pitkäjouset; Nuorten leikki- ja pehmojouset
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Caça e tiro > Tiro com arco > Arcos e bestas > Arcos juvenis: Arcos compostos juvenis; Arcos recurvos e longbows juvenis; Arcos macios e de brinquedo juvenis
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 打猎与射击 > 射箭 > 弓/弩 > 儿童弓: 青少年复合弓; 青少年反曲弓与长弓; 青少年玩具弓与软头弓
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Myślistwo i strzelectwo > Łucznictwo > Łuki i kusze > Łuki młodzieżowe: Młodzieżowe łuki bloczkowe; Młodzieżowe łuki refleksyjne i proste; Młodzieżowe łuki zabawkowe i miękkie
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Lov in streljanje > Lokostrelstvo > Loki in samostreli > Loki za začetnike: Otroški compound loki; Ukrivljeni in longbow loki za mlade; Otroški igralni loki in mehki loki
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Avcılık ve Atıcılık > Okçuluk > Yaylar ve Arbaletler > Gençlik Yayları: Gençlere yönelik makaralı yaylar; Gençlere yönelik klasik ve uzun yaylar; Gençlere yönelik oyuncak ve yumuşak yaylar
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Охота и стрельба > Стрельба из лука > Луки и арбалеты > Детские луки: Юниорские блочные луки; Юниорские рекурсивные и традиционные луки; Детские игрушечные и мягкие луки
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Chasse et tir > Tir à l'arc > Arcs et arbalètes > Arcs jeunesse: Arcs à poulies pour jeunes; Arcs classiques et arcs longs pour jeunes; Arcs jouets et arcs à embout souple pour jeunes
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Medžioklė ir šaudymas > Lankininkystė > Lankai ir arbaletai > Lankai jaunimui: Vaikiški blokiniai lankai; Vaikiški atbuliniai ir ilgieji lankai; Vaikiški žaisliniai ir minkšti lankai
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Κυνήγι & σκοποβολή > Τοξοβολία > Τόξα & βαλλίστρες > Τόξα νεολαίας: Παιδικά σύνθετα τόξα; Παιδικά ανακυρτά και μακριά τόξα; Παιδικά τόξα παιχνίδια και μαλακά τόξα
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Poľovníctvo a streľba > Lukostreľba > Luky a kuše > Mládežnícke luky: Kladkové luky pre mládež; Juniorské reflexné a dlhé luky; Hračkárske a mäkké kuše pre mládež
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Caza y tiro > Tiro con arco > Arcos y ballestas > Arcos juveniles: Arcos compuestos juveniles; Arcos largos y recurvos juveniles; Arcos de juguete y blandos juveniles
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Jakt og skyting > Bueskyting > Buer og armbrøster > Ungdomsbuer: Compoundbuer for junior; Recurvebuer og langbuer for junior; Lekebuer og myke buer for junior
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Лов и стрелба > Стрелба с лък > Лъкове и арбалети > Младежки лъкове: Младежки сложни лъкове; Младежки извити и дълги лъкове; Детски играчки и меки лъкове
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Jagen und Schießen > Bogenschießen > Bögen & Armbrüste > Jugendbögen: Jugend-Compoundbogen; Jugend-Recurve- & Langbogen; Spielzeug- & Softbogen für Jugendliche
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Lov i streljaštvo > Streličarstvo > Lukovi i samostreli > Dječji lukovi: Dječji složeni lukovi; Dječji zakrivljeni i dugi lukovi; Dječji lukovi igrače i mekani lukovi
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Jagt og skydning > Bueskydning > Buer og armbrøste > Ungdomsbuer: Compoundbuer til unge; Recurve- og langbuer til unge; Legetøjs- og softbuer til unge
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Jakt och skytte > Bågskytte > Pilbågar och armborst > Ungdomsbågar: Compoundbågar för ungdomar; Recurve- och långbågar för ungdomar; Leksaks- och mjuka pilbågar för ungdomar